Vermont, session 2025-2026, H311.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 173, Sec. 1 is amended to read:
VT LEG #380808 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.311
2025 Page 2 of 3
Sec. 1. FY 2023; RESTORATION OF SERVICE; VERMONT STATE
TEACHERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM
(a) Authority. Notwithstanding 16 V.S.A. § 1939 or any other provision of
law, in fiscal year 2023, a beneficiary who retired from the System as a
Group A or a Group C member may resume service, as that term is defined in
16 V.S.A. § 1931, to serve as an interim school educator for a period not to
exceed one school year and receive the beneficiary’s retirement allowance for
the entire period that service is resumed, provided that:
(1) the beneficiary has received a retirement allowance for six months or
more immediately preceding the resumption of service;
(2) the employer of the beneficiary is subject to the assessment set forth
in 16 V.S.A. § 1944d on behalf of the beneficiary and remits payment to the
Benefits Fund; and
(3) the employer of the beneficiary remits payment to the Vermont
Teachers’ Retirement Fund, established in 16 V.S.A. § 1944, in an amount
equal to the contribution rate established for members of the beneficiary’s
group for any period that service is resumed.
(b) Period of service. A person who resumes service under subsection (a)
of this section shall not make any contributions to the System during the
person’s period of service and shall not be entitled to a retirement allowance
separately computed for the period that service was resumed.
VT LEG #380808 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.311
2025 Page 3 of 3
(c) Employment certification. Each superintendent who hires an interim
school educator pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall certify to the
Board that the district exhausted all reasonable options to employ a qualified
active educator prior to employing a beneficiary as an interim school educator.
(d) Renewal.
(1) In fiscal years 2024 and 2025 through 2030, the State Treasurer is
authorized to grant not more than two seven renewals for a one-fiscal-year
period to the authority described in subsection (a) of this section. The State
Treasurer shall make the determination to renew the authority not earlier than
June May 1 but not later than June 30 May 31 in each fiscal year and shall
notify the House Committee on Government Operations and Military Affairs
and Senate Committees Committee on Government Operations of the
determination.
(2) In the event the State Treasurer makes a determination to renew the
authority pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, a beneficiary may only
resume service during each one-year renewal period if service is performed in
a different interim school educator position. [Repealed.]
(e) Repeal. This section shall be repealed on June 30, 2026 2031.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380808 v.1